Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. Property Insurance Contracts

Cross references. —

For definition of “property insurance,” see §

26-5-104

.

As to rates for property coverage, §

26-14-105

.

As to rate filings for property insurance, see §

26-14-107

.

As to insurable interest in property, see §

26-15-104

.

As to farm mutual property insurers, see §§

26-26-101

through

26-26-131

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 482 to 512; 44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 939 to 977, 1108 to 1286, 1489 to 1511.

Who is member of “family” or “household” of insured within coverage of property insurance policy, 1 ALR2d 561.

Provisions of policy concerning location of personal property covered by it, 4 ALR2d 868.

Amount of insurer's liability as affected by insured's executory contract to sell the property, 8 ALR2d 1408.

What constitutes “upset” or “overturning” within provisions of property damage policy covering losses so caused, 8 ALR2d 1433.

Right to proceeds or to apportionment thereof in regard to insurance policy issued jointly to lessor and lessee covering destruction of or damage to building, 8 ALR2d 1445.

Lien creditor's right to proceeds of property insurance payable to owner not bound to carry insurance for former's benefit, 9 ALR2d 299.

Error in periodic reports required by insurance policy respecting property covered or other insurance in effect, as breach of warranty, 13 ALR2d 713.

What constitutes additions to or extension of buildings within purview of insurance policies upon buildings and such additions, 19 ALR2d 606.

Time within which insurer must make election to rebuild, repair or replace insured property, 29 ALR2d 720.

Extent of recovery by insured stockholder for loss of corporation's property, 39 ALR2d 723.

What constitutes “jewelry” within coverage or exceptions of personal property insurance policy, 40 ALR2d 871.

Insurer's waiver of proof of property loss, 49 ALR2d 87.

Test or criterion of “actual cash value” under insurance policy insuring to extent of actual cash value at time of loss, 61 ALR2d 711.

Applicability of fraud and false swearing clause of fire insurance policy to testimony given at trial, 64 ALR2d 962.

Rights of vendor and purchaser as between themselves in insurance proceeds, 64 ALR2d 1402.

Right to proceeds of insurance as between holder of title to real estate and one having option to purchase it, 65 ALR2d 989.

Damage from sonic boom as within property insurance policy, 74 ALR2d 754.

Fluctuations in cost of making repairs between time of loss and time of payment as affecting property insurer's liability, 74 ALR2d 1272.

Construction of property insurance provision excluding liability for destruction caused by order of civil authority, 84 ALR2d 683.

Construction of clause of property insurance policy excluding from coverage losses occasioned by normal settling, shrinking or expansion of foundations, walls, floors, ceilings or the like, 86 ALR2d 715.

Insurer's liability as affected by refusal of public authorities to permit reconstruction or repair after fire, 90 ALR2d 790.

Rights and remedies of property insurer as against third-person tortfeasor who has settled with insured, 92 ALR2d 102.

“Contamination” within coverage or exclusion from coverage of property damage policy, 96 ALR2d 1360.

Necessity and manner of property insurer's giving notice of exercising option to repair insured property, 98 ALR2d 1319.

Rights in proceeds of insurance on property held jointly with right of survivorship where one of joint owners dies pending payment of proceeds, 4 ALR3d 427.

Necessity and sufficiency of insurer's demand, under fire insurance policy, for examination of insured or his books or papers, or for proofs of loss, certificates or sworn statements, 4 ALR3d 631.

Insured's failure to inform insurer of pending condemnation proceedings as concealment or fraud within provision of fire policy, 9 ALR3d 1411.

Temporary fire, wind or hail insurance pending issuance of policy, 14 ALR3d 568.

Time within which demand for appraisal of property loss must be made, under insurance policy providing for such appraisal, 14 ALR3d 674.

Construction of insurance coverage as to loss of or injury to trees, lawns and shrubbery, 14 ALR3d 1056.

Overvaluation in proof of loss of property insured as fraud avoiding fire insurance policy, 16 ALR3d 774.

Loss by heat, smoke or soot without external ignition as within fire insurance policy, 17 ALR3d 1155.

What are “fixtures” within provision of property insurance policy expressly extending coverage to fixtures, 17 ALR3d 1381.

Property insurance or public liability insurance as covering, in absence of express provision, after-acquired premises or realty or subsequent additions to described realty, 18 ALR3d 795.

What constitutes a private structure or a private structure not used for mercantile purposes within the meaning of property insurance policies, 19 ALR3d 902.

Purposes for which premises are occupied or used as increase of hazard voiding insurance coverage, 19 ALR3d 1336.

Determination of amount payable on loss to growing crop under policy insuring against loss or injury, 20 ALR3d 924.

What constitutes “vandalism” or “malicious mischief” within coverage of property insurance policy, 23 ALR3d 1259.

Fraud, false swearing or other misconduct of insured as barring recovery on property insurance by innocent coinsured, 24 ALR3d 450.

Insured's ignorance of loss or casualty, cause of damage, coverage or existence of policy, or identity of insurer, as affecting or excusing compliance with requirements as to time for giving notice, making proof of loss or bringing action against insurer, 24 ALR3d 1007.

Necessity and sufficiency of notice of and hearing in proceedings before appraisers and arbitrators appointed to determine amount of loss, 25 ALR3d 680.

Recoverability under property insurance of insured's expenses to prevent or mitigate damages, 33 ALR3d 1262.

Remedies and measure of damages for wrongful cancellation of liability and property insurance, 34 ALR3d 385.

Fire insurance on corporate property as affected by its intentional destruction by a corporate officer, employee or stockholder, 37 ALR3d 1385.

Validity, construction and effect of insurance policy provision requiring insured to maintain coverage to specified value of property (coinsurance clause), 43 ALR3d 566.

What are “appurtenant” private structures within provision of property insurance policy expressly extending coverage to such structures, 43 ALR3d 1351.

Construction and effect of provision excluding loss caused by earth movement or earthquake, 44 ALR3d 1316.

What constitutes “direct loss” under windstorm insurance coverage, 65 ALR3d 1128.

Construction and effect of provision of property insurance policy permitting recovery of replacement cost of property, in excess of actual cash value, 66 ALR3d 885.

What constitutes “collapse” of a building within coverage of property insurance policy, 71 ALR3d 1072.

What constitutes “ensuing loss” caused by water damage within coverage provision of property insurance policy, 78 ALR3d 950.

Construction and application of automatic sprinkler provision in fire insurance policy, 79 ALR3d 539.

Bailee's liability as affected by bailment condition that bailor procure insurance, 83 ALR3d 519.

Loss through payment of extortion demand at place other than insured's premises as within coverage of theft policy insuring against losses incurred on premises, 85 ALR3d 1103.

Title insurance: exclusion of liability for defects, liens, or encumbrances created, suffered, assumed, or agreed to by the insured, 87 ALR3d 515.

What constitutes a charge, encumbrance, or lien within contemplation of title insurance policy, 87 ALR3d 764.

Duty and liability of real estate agent or broker to purchaser with respect to procurement or transfer of insurance policy, 88 ALR3d 1077.

Liability policy providing coverage for damages because of injury to or destruction of property as covering injury to investments, 92 ALR3d 525.

Insured's nondisclosure of information regarding value of property as ground for avoiding liability under property insurance policy, 15 ALR4th 1109.

Right of mortgagee, who acquires title to mortgaged premises in satisfaction of mortgage, to recover, under fire insurance policy covering him as “mortgagee,” for loss or injury to property thereafter damaged or destroyed by fire, 19 ALR4th 778.

Construction and effect of provision of homeowner's, premises, or personal liability insurance policy covering or excluding watercraft, 26 ALR4th 967.

Construction and application of aviation exclusion clauses in public liability or homeowners' insurance policies, 39 ALR4th 201.

What is “aircraft” or the like within meaning of exclusion or exception clause of insurance policy, 39 ALR4th 214.

Liability insurance: when is vehicle in “dead storage,” 48 ALR4th 591.

Theft and vandalism insurance: coinsured's misconduct as barring innocent coinsured's right to recover on policy, 64 ALR4th 714.

What is “flood” within exclusionary clause of property damage policy, 78 ALR4th 817.

Construction and effect of property insurance provision permitting recovery of replacement cost of property, 1 ALR5th 817.

Requirement under property insurance policy that insured submit to examination under oath as to loss, 16 ALR5th 412.

Construction and effect of “jeweler's block” policies or provisions contained therein, 22 ALR5th 579.

What constitutes “vacant land” within meaning of liability or property insurance policy provisions, 47 ALR5th 535.

45 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 577 to 689; 46 C.J.S. Insurance §§ 907 to 920, 1103 to 1119; 46A C.J.S. Insurance §§ 1275 to 1300.

§ 26-23-101.
Overinsurance prohibited.

No person shall buy insurance on property within this state for an amount which, together with any existing insurance, exceeds the fair value of the property or of the interest of the insured therein. This provision does not apply as to insurance of replacement value.

Anyone who willfully violates this section is subject to the penalties provided in W.S.

26-1-107

.

History.

Laws 1921, ch. 142, § 13; R.S. 1931, § 57-213; C.S. 1945, § 52-401; W.S. 1957, § 26-77, 26.1-454; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 454; W.S. 1977, §

26-26-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Depreciation as factor in determining actual cash value for partial loss under insurance policy, 8 ALR4th 533.

Obtaining new property insurance as cancellation of existing insurance, 14 ALR4th 781.

§ 26-23-102.
Adjuster's reports of overinsurance and causes of fire; reports deemed privileged communications.

Any adjuster who investigates any property loss claim in this state shall report to the commissioner in writing any overinsurance of the property he discovers.

Any adjuster who investigates any property fire loss in this state shall report in writing to the commissioner the origin and cause of the fire, so far as he can reasonably ascertain them, together with any circumstances which in his opinion may indicate fraud or attempted fraud.

Any report submitted to the commissioner under this section, together with any accompanying information, document, record or statement, is an absolutely privileged communication. The report may be disclosed as authorized by and in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 26-2-113(d).

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 455; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-455; W.S. 1977, §

26-26-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to arson to defraud insurer, see §§

6-3-101

,

6-3-102

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Obtaining new property insurance as cancellation of existing insurance, 14 ALR4th 781.

§ 26-23-103.
Return of excess premium in certain cases of total destruction.

If the insured property is totally destroyed and the total amount of loss is less than the total amount insured thereon as to the hazard causing the loss, the insurer shall return to the insured at the time of payment of the loss the amount of premiums paid under the policy then in force for the excess of insurance over the fair value of the property at the time of the loss. This section does not apply to insurance of replacement value.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 456; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-456; W.S. 1977, §

26-26-103

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-104.
Terms of policies; extension.

No insurer shall issue a policy insuring property in this state for a term longer than five (5) years.

The term of any such policy may be extended by certificate as provided in W.S.

26-15-121

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 457; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-457; W.S. 1977, §

26-26-104

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Homeowner's liability insurance coverage of injury from formaldehyde insulation in insured premises, 85 ALR4th 956.

§ 26-23-105.
Exemptions.

W.S. 26-23-101(a),

26-23-102

and

26-23-103

do not apply to insurance on stocks of merchandise or property of fluctuating values, if the reduced rate contribution clause is made a part of the policy. This chapter does not apply to wet marine and transportation insurance.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 458; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-458; W.S. 1977, §

26-26-105

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-23-106.
Use of insurance support organizations limited.

This section shall apply if an insurer uses for underwriting purposes for insurance policies information from a report provided by, or database maintained by, an insurance support organization, or consumer reporting agency, related to the premises that is the subject of the application or to the person applying for insurance. Failure of the insurer, within forty-five (45) calendar days of issuing a binder, to act upon the information referenced in this section precludes the insurer from declining insurance coverage or terminating a binder of insurance coverage based on the information. Notwithstanding any other law, an insurer may decline or terminate insurance coverage based on the condition of the premises as determined through a physical inspection of the premises. This section applies only to homeowner’s insurance and does not apply to a policy renewal.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 4 provides: “The insurance commissioner may begin the promulgation of rules implementing the provisions of this act upon the effective date of this section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6, makes § 4 effective July 1, 2004.

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 5 provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply to insurance policies delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2004.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

§ 26-23-107.
Cancellation and nonrenewal of homeowner's insurance policies for natural causes restricted.

No homeowner’s insurance policy shall be denied renewal as a result of a single claim within a three (3) year period arising from natural causes.

No homeowner’s insurance policy shall be cancelled during its term as a result of any claim arising from natural causes.

As used in this section “natural cause” means an act occasioned exclusively by the violence of nature where all human agency is excluded from creating or contributing to the cause of the damage or injury.

Any insurer which violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to the procedures and penalties provided under this code. Following the procedures in this code, the commissioner may order the reinstatement, with no lapse in coverage, of any policy cancelled or nonrenewed in violation of this section.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 4 provides: “The insurance commissioner may begin the promulgation of rules implementing the provisions of this act upon the effective date of this section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 1, makes § 4 effective July 1, 2004.

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 5 provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply to insurance policies delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2004.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

§ 26-23-108.
Restrictions on underwriting for homeowner policies.

No insurer shall cancel, refuse to renew or offer to renew at a higher premium a homeowner’s insurance policy based in any manner upon the claims history of a named insured unless the claims history excludes customer inquiries. Customer inquiries are defined as telephone calls or other requests for information made by the named insured or a person who would be a named insured under the policy, that reference the terms, conditions or coverage afforded under an insurance contract and do not result in claims being filed or paid.

Any insurer which violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to the procedures and penalties provided under this code. Following the procedures in this code, the commissioner may order the reinstatement, with no lapse in coverage, of any policy cancelled or nonrenewed in violation of this section. If the commissioner finds a policy was renewed at a higher premium in violation of this section he may order the return of any unauthorized increase in premium together with interest at a rate of ten percent (10%) per year.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 4 provides: “The insurance commissioner may begin the promulgation of rules implementing the provisions of this act upon the effective date of this section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6, makes § 4 effective July 1, 2004.

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 5 provides: “The provisions of this act shall apply to insurance policies delivered, issued for delivery or renewed in this state on or after July 1, 2004.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6(a), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.